incubator/apertium-snd/apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l>ڻ</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نديون</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!-- past/future tense : check examples in corpus or more examples on web -->
      <e><p><l>يس</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ياسين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ئين</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئينءَ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>يو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يا</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ندس</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندس</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندين</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندو</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ندي</l><r>ڻ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="سمهڻ"><i>سمه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="اچڻ"><i>اچ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوڻ"><i>چ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڃڻ"><i>وڃ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڃڻ"><i>وي</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڃڻ"><i>و</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="هڻڻ"><i>ه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇڏڻ"><i>ڇڏ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="توڙڻ"><i>توڙ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="هلڻ"><i>هل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="پيئڻ"><i>پيئ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رهڻ"><i>ره</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="پوڻ"><i>پو</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="مرڻ"><i>مر</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڊڄڻ"><i>ڊڄ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڊوڙڻ"><i>ڊوڙ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوڻ"><i>چو</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڪڻڻ"><i>وڪڻ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="موڪلڻ"><i>موڪل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سمهڻ"><i>سمه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳالهائڻ"><i>ڳالهائ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سيکارڻ"><i>سيکار</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سمجهڻ"><i>سمجه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="هلڻ"><i>هل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کٽڻ"><i>کٽ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رکڻ"><i>رک</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="بيهڻ"><i>بيه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڄڻ"><i>وڄ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سڙڻ"><i>سڙ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کوٽڻ"><i>کوٽ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪرڻ"><i>ڪر</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ترڻ"><i>تر</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وهڻ"><i>وه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="اڏامڻ"><i>اڏام</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڄمڻ"><i>ڄم</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کلڻ"><i>کل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کيڏڻ"><i>کيڏ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سبڻ"><i>سب</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳائڻ"><i>ڳائ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ويهڻ"><i>ويه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سنگهڻ"><i>سنگه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ٿڪڻ"><i>ٿڪ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="بيهڻ"><i>بيه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سبڻ"><i>سب</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ترڻ"><i>تر</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="سوچڻ"><i>سوچ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="مڙڻ"><i>مڙ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳڻڻ"><i>ڳڻ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪٽڻ"><i>ڪٽ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڊڄڻ"><i>ڊڄ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڙهڻ"><i>وڙه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="مارڻ"><i>مار</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="جهلڻ"><i>جهل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇڪڻ"><i>ڇڪ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڌڪڻ"><i>ڌڪ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="مهٽڻ"><i>مهٽ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کرچڻ"><i>کرچ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="هارڻ"><i>هار</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوسڻ"><i>چوس</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="اڇلڻ"><i>اڇل</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ٻڌڻ"><i>ٻڌ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڌوئڻ"><i>ڌوئ</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="اگهڻ"><i>اگه</i><par n="سمه/ڻ__vblex_iv"/></e>
